Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202613-3309
Inland port authority; bonds, interest, proceeds; exempt from taxes and assessments; exception; real or personal property; exempt from property taxation, when.

No inland port authority shall be required to pay any taxes or any assessments whatsoever to the State of Nebraska or to any political subdivision of the state, except for assessments under the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act and any combined tax due or payments in lieu of contributions as required under the Employment Security Law. The bonds issued under the Municipal Inland Port Authority Act, the interest thereon, the proceeds received by a holder from the sale of such bonds to the extent of the holder's cost of acquisition, or proceeds received upon redemption prior to maturity, proceeds received at maturity, and the receipt of such interest and proceeds of every inland port authority and the income therefrom shall, at all times, be exempt from any taxes and any assessments, except for inheritance and gift taxes and taxes on transfers. Any real or personal property subject to a lease agreement of an inland port authority, whether the authority is lessee or lessor, shall be exempt from property taxation pursuant to section 77-202.

Laws 2021, LB156, § 9;

Laws 2026, LB1114, § 74.
July 18, 2026
Employment Security Law, see section 48-601.

Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act, see section 48-1,110.